California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
After the second installment of taxes on the secured roll is delinquent, the tax collector shall collect a cost of up to fifty-five dollars ($55), but no more than the actual cost, for preparing the delinquent tax records and giving notice of delinquency on each separate valuation on the secured roll of:

(a) Real property, except possessory interests.

(b) Possessory interests.

(c) Personal property cross-secured to real property.

The cost shall be collected even though the property appears on the roll due to a special assessment and no valuation of the property is given.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 451, Sec. 2.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2623.

Prior to February 1st, the auditor shall:

(a) Compute and enter the delinquent penalty against all taxes on the secured roll not marked paid.

(b) Foot the penalties.

(c) Charge the tax collector with the total penalties due on the secured roll. 

(d) Deliver the secured roll to the tax collector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 799.)
-------------------------------------------

2624.

After the second half of taxes on real property is delinquent, the tax collector shall prepare a delinquent roll. In numerical or alphabetical order, the delinquent roll shall show all information on the secured roll relating to property the taxes on which are delinquent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 409.)
-------------------------------------------

2626.

On or before June 1st, the auditor shall compare the delinquent roll, if one is prepared, with the secured roll. If satisfied the delinquent roll is correct, he shall:

(a) Foot the unpaid taxes and penalties.

(b) Credit the tax collector with the unpaid taxes and penalties on the secured roll.

(c) Make a final settlement with him of all taxes and penalties charged against him on the secured roll.

The tax collector shall deliver the treasurer’s
 receipt to the auditor, unless the treasurer is the collector, and shall immediately account for any deficiency. The secured roll shall remain in the tax collector’s office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 142.)
-------------------------------------------

2627.

Within three days after this settlement, the auditor shall:

(a) Compute and enter the penalties and costs on the delinquent roll.

(b) Charge the tax collector with the amount due on the delinquent roll.

(c) Deliver the delinquent roll duly certified, to the tax collector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 409.)
-------------------------------------------

2628.

Annually, on or before August 10th, the tax collector shall make a collections report on the secured roll and, if one is prepared, the delinquent roll, and make it or them available to the auditor for purposes of audit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 142.)
-------------------------------------------

2629.

The auditor shall then administer an oath to the tax collector, to be written and subscribed on the delinquent roll, that all property on the delinquent roll on which taxes have been paid has been credited with the payment on the delinquent roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 409.)
-------------------------------------------

2630.

The auditor shall foot the amount unpaid on the delinquent roll, credit the tax collector with the amount, and have a final settlement with him.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 694.)
-------------------------------------------

2631.

If the roll or delinquent roll is transferred from one collector to another, the auditor shall credit the one and charge the other with the amount outstanding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 409.)
-------------------------------------------

2632.

If the tax collector refuses or neglects for five days to make payments or settlements as required in this division, he is liable for the full amount of taxes charged against him.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

2633.

The district attorney shall bring suit against the tax collector and his sureties for this amount. The controller or the board of supervisors may require the district attorney to bring this suit if he neglects his duty. After the suit is commenced, no credit shall be made to the collector for taxes outstanding.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

2634.

The roll or delinquent roll or a copy certified by the tax collector, showing unpaid taxes against any property, is prima facie evidence of the assessment, the property assessed, the delinquency, the amount of taxes due and unpaid, and that there has been compliance with all forms of law relating to assessment and levy of the taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1101.)
-------------------------------------------

2635.

When the amount of taxes paid exceeds the amount due by more than twenty dollars ($20), the tax collector shall send notice of the overpayment to the taxpayer. The notice shall be mailed to the taxpayer’s last known address and shall state the amount of overpayment and that a refund claim may be filed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 5096) of Part 9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 258, Sec. 3.   (SB 789)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2635.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, the tax collector may apply any refund due a taxpayer, or the taxpayer’s agent, to any delinquent taxes due for the same property for which the same taxpayer, or his or her agent, is liable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 161, Sec. 1.   (AB 2643)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2636.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in the case of a deficiency in the payment of taxes due and payable pursuant to this chapter, the tax collector, with the approval of the board of supervisors, may accept such partial payment from the taxpayer. Such partial payments are to be applied first to all penalties, interest and costs with the balance being applied to the taxes due. The difference between the amount paid by the taxpayer and the amount due shall be treated as a delinquent tax in the same manner as any other delinquent tax.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 242.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.1. Collection in Equal Installments [2700. - 2708.]

2700.

Notwithstanding Sections 2605, 2606, 2607, 2617, 2618, 2621, and 2624, if so ordered by a resolution of the board of supervisors of any county, this chapter shall be applicable to that county, provided that the resolution shall be adopted prior to the time the county auditor is required to compute and enter on the secured roll the respective amounts due in installments as taxes for the assessment year in which the resolution becomes effective. This chapter shall apply only to that county and shall then apply until otherwise ordered by a resolution of the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 611.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2700.1.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, any tax, assessment, fee or charge to become a lien on land and to be collected with county taxes or other taxes or assessments collected on the secured roll shall be payable in two (2) installments as specified in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1926.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.

Half the taxes on real and personal property on the secured roll are due November 1st, and if the amount is not evenly divisible by two, the odd cent is also due unless the roll shows the odd cent as part of the second installment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 246.)
-------------------------------------------

2702.

The second half of taxes on real and personal property on the secured roll is due February 1st.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 384.)
-------------------------------------------

2703.

The entire tax on the secured roll may be paid when the first half is due. The first half may be paid separately when the first half is due or at any time thereafter until the properties on the current roll become tax defaulted. The second half may be paid separately only if the first half has been paid. The tax collector shall accept payment of current year taxes even though prior year delinquencies on the real property may exist. The acceptance of that payment shall not affect the validity of any sale in satisfaction of a lien for defaulted taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 988, Sec. 8.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

2704.

All taxes due November 1, if unpaid, are delinquent at 5 p.m., or the close of business, whichever is later, on December 10, and thereafter a delinquent penalty of 10 percent attaches to them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 532, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

2705.

The second half of taxes on the secured roll, if unpaid, is delinquent at 5 p.m., or the close of business, whichever is later, on April 10, and thereafter a delinquent penalty of 10 percent attaches to it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 532, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

2705.5.

If December 10 or April 10 falls on Saturday, Sunday or a legal holiday, the time of delinquency is at 5 p.m., or the close of business, whichever is later, on the next business day. If the board of supervisors, by adoption of an ordinance or resolution, closes the county’s offices for business prior to the time of delinquency on the “next business day” or for that whole day, that day shall be considered a legal holiday for purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 705, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2706.

After the second installment of taxes on the secured roll is delinquent, the tax collector shall collect a cost of up to fifty-five dollars ($55), but no more than the actual cost, for preparing the delinquent tax records and giving notice of delinquency on each separate valuation on the secured roll of:

(a) Real property, except possessory interests.

(b) Possessory interests.

(c) Personal property cross-secured to real property.

The cost shall be collected even though the property appears on the roll due to a special assessment and no valuation of the property is given.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 451, Sec. 3.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2707.

After the second half of taxes on the secured roll is delinquent, the tax collector shall prepare a delinquent roll. In numerical or alphabetical order, the delinquent roll shall show all information on the secured roll relating to property the taxes on which are delinquent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 976.)
-------------------------------------------

2708.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in the case of a deficiency in the payment of taxes due and payable pursuant to this chapter, the tax collector, with the approval of the board of supervisors, may accept such partial payment from the taxpayer. Such partial payments are to be applied first to all penalties, interest and costs with the balance being applied to the taxes due. The difference between the amount paid by the taxpayer and the amount due shall be treated as a delinquent tax in the same manner as any other delinquent tax.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 242.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.3. Return of Replicated Property Tax Payments [2780. - 2783.]

2780.

The Legislature finds and declares that the retention by counties of replicated property tax payments and the failure to return any replicated payment to the tendering party for a period of time greater than two months works a hardship on taxpayers and businesses engaged in processing real estate transfers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1201, Sec. 1.   Effective September 26, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

2780.5.

For purposes of this chapter, “replicated payment” means a payment, submitted by or on behalf of a taxpayer, which is indicated for application to a specific tax or tax installment which has already been paid, whether or not the prior payment and the replicated payment are in the same amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 421, Sec. 1.   Effective August 22, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

2781.

If a taxpayer or agent for the taxpayer submits a payment indicated for application to a specific tax or tax installment and that tax or tax installment already has been paid, the county shall return the replicated payment to the tendering party within 60 days of the date the payment becomes final. For purposes of this section, “final” means the original payment that is not subject to chargeback, dishonor, or reversal. However, when a replicated payment is made of any tax or tax installment paid by the Controller to the county pursuant to Section 2514, the amount of the replicated payment shall be paid to the claimant on whose behalf the payment was made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 387, Sec. 20.   (SB 205)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2781.5.

(a) An owner of record may instruct a tax collector, by written request, to refund a replicated payment on a current assessment to the tendering party who is not an owner of record, if that tendering party is known at the time the request is made by the owner of record.

(b) The request shall be submitted by the owner of record and shall satisfy both of the following requirements:

(1) The request shall be certified by the owner of record as true, correct, and complete to the best of his or her knowledge.

(2) The request shall be accompanied by a certified copy of a deed, judgment, or other instrument that legally verifies ownership of the property.

(c) The tax collector shall not be required to make a determination as to the ownership of the property.

(d) This section does not apply to any payment on a current assessment that is delinquent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 85, Sec. 2.   Effective August 6, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2782.

If a replicated tax payment is not returned to the tendering party within 60 days of becoming final, as provided in this chapter, the county shall, in addition to returning the replicated payment as soon as practicable, pay the tendering party interest, if that interest is ten dollars ($10) or more, on the amount of replicated payment at the rate provided in Section 5151. The interest shall be computed for the period beginning 60 days after the replicated payment becomes final to the date the replicated payment is returned to the tendering party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 17, Sec. 3.   (SB 823)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2783.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed as prohibiting a tax collector’s exercise of reasonable judgment in applying a payment for which the wrong payment stub has been returned by the payor or in any case in which no indication of intended application has been made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1201, Sec. 1.   Effective September 26, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Collection of Part of an Assessment [2801. - 2827.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [2801. - 2802.]

2801.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state and the intent of this chapter to provide for:

(a) The satisfaction and removal of any lien secured to any parcel of real property appearing on the current roll.

(b) The payment of taxes on any parcel of real property separately from the whole assessment, if the parcel (1) is described in any duly executed and recorded deed, purchase contract, deed of trust, mortgage, or final decree of court; or (2) has a separate valuation on the current roll.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1293.)
-------------------------------------------

2802.

For the purposes of this chapter:

(a) Improvements are not a parcel separate from the land on which they are situated.

(b) An undivided interest is a parcel separate from the whole assessment.

(c) A lien is the amount created by the assessment of personal property, or leasehold improvements, or possessory interests; or the amount levied against property by a taxing agency or revenue district when such amount is not determined by the application of a tax rate on a valuation of property. A lien includes any special assessment bond, or installment thereof, together with interest and charges authorized and accruing thereto. A lien also includes any charge of any nature whatsoever authorized by law to be levied against property by any taxing agency or revenue district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1293.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Payments [2811. - 2812.]

2811.

Any person may apply to the tax collector to satisfy and remove any lien by paying the sum of the following:

(a) The amount computed by multiplying the assessed value of the personal property, or leasehold improvements, or possessory interests by the applicable tax rate for the current year, if the lien sought to be satisfied and removed was created by a determination of the value of personal property, or leasehold improvements, or possessory interests; or the amount of the lien of the special assessment; or the amount of any other lien authorized by law to be levied against real property.

(b) Delinquent penalties in an amount which bear the same proportion to the delinquent penalties in the whole assessment as the amount of the lien bears to the total taxes in the whole assessment.

(c) Costs computed in the same manner as provided for the computation of delinquent penalties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1293.)
-------------------------------------------

2812.

The amount due on the remainder of the assessment shall be the difference between the amount due on the whole assessment and the amount paid to satisfy and remove the lien.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1293.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Applications and Computations for Separate Assessments [2821. - 2827.]

2821.

Any person filing an affidavit of interest may apply to the tax collector to have any parcel separately valued on the current roll for the purpose of paying taxes. A county may, upon approval of the board of supervisors, require that the applicant notify the property owner.

The application shall be made during the current fiscal year, and shall set forth the fact that a duly executed and recorded deed, purchase contract, deed of trust, mortgage, or final decree of court describes the parcel sought to be separately valued. A county may, upon approval of the board of supervisors, allow
 these applications between July 1 and March 31.

The application may request that the tax created by the assessment of personal property, or leasehold improvements, or possessory interests on the whole assessment be allowed to remain as a lien on the parcel sought to be separately valued.

If any lien not determined by the application of a tax rate on a valuation of property has been levied or placed on the whole assessment, the application may be accompanied by the certification of the taxing agency or revenue district authorized by law to levy or place the lien, setting forth the specific amount of that portion of the lien levied or placed on the whole
 assessment which is to continue to be levied or placed on the parcel sought to be separately valued.

The board of supervisors may provide that a parcel with a lien against it and other property, pursuant to the Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code) or the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Streets and Highways Code) will not be separately valued unless a request has been made to the agency levying the bond lien for a division of land and bond. A copy of the requested division of land and bond shall accompany the request for separate property tax valuation.

Any separations of property pursuant to this section are for valuing property for tax purposes only, and are not intended to create a legal building site or to supersede requirements pursuant to zoning, building, lot split, or
 subdivision ordinances.

Once created, an individual interest parcel may be entered as a separate assessment on subsequent assessment rolls until the time that ownership of the interest is conveyed or until the original applicant or his or her agent requests that the parcel be recombined.

Upon authorization by ordinance by the board of supervisors, the county may charge a fee for actual costs incurred for the processing of an application for separate assessment, and the initial and ongoing costs of separate assessment, billings, and mailings. Fees shall be subject to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 54985) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, and may be billed separately or prior to initial separate tax bills, or both, or collected on subsequent tax bills, and shall be deposited in the county’s general fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 351, Sec. 17.   (SB 947)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2823.

(a) The county assessor shall determine a separate valuation on the parcel, and shall determine the valuation of the remaining parcel. The sum of the valuations of the parcels shall equal their total valuation before separation.

(b) A separate valuation shall not be made of any parcel covered by a subdivision map filed for record after the lien date immediately preceding the current fiscal year. However, this prohibition shall not apply in any county in which the board of supervisors provides for a separate valuation pursuant to an ordinance adopted by a majority vote of the board. In connection with the recording of a final subdivision map a segregation may nevertheless be made so as to include all of the land within the
 subdivision in a single parcel.

(c) A separate valuation shall not be made dividing any piece of property separately assessed in the original assessment into more than four parcels. However, this prohibition shall not apply in any county in which the board of supervisors so provides in an ordinance adopted by a majority vote of the board.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a separate valuation to divide any existing residential structure into a subdivision, as defined in Section 66424 of the Government Code, shall not be made until a subdivision final map or parcel map, as described in Sections 66434 and 66445, respectively, of the Government Code has been recorded as required by law. If the requirement for a parcel map is waived pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 66428 of the Government Code, then the assessor shall not assign any parcel numbers or prepare a
 separate assessment or separate valuation, unless the applicant provides a copy of the finding made by the legislative body or advisory agency, as required by that subdivision.

(e) With respect to nonresidential subdivisions, without regard to the number of parcels involved, which are covered by special assessment liens the bonds for which are owned by a county, the board of supervisors of that county may authorize the county assessor, auditor, and tax collector to prorate the amounts for past due property taxes and assessment liens, plus any interest and penalties that may have accrued thereon, among the various parcels in the subdivision. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the tax collector may then enter into an installment payment agreement with respect to the pending subdivision map and thereupon the agreement shall be deemed the equivalent of a certificate pursuant to Section 66492 of the Government Code for purposes of
 permitting the filing of the final map and shall be recorded together with the final map, provided that the past due property taxes, assessment liens, and the special assessment lien shall not be discharged of record by the agreement, but shall be prorated among the parcels created by the final map.

(f) If the application requested that the tax created by the assessment of personal property, or leasehold improvements, or possessory interests be allowed to remain as a lien on the parcel sought to be separately valued, and the assessor determines that the value of the parcel is sufficient to secure the payment of the tax, the assessor shall set forth the value of such personal property, or leasehold improvements, or possessory interests opposite the assessor’s determination of the value of the parcel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 204, Sec. 5.   (SB 822)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2824.

The assessor shall transmit the application to the auditor, who shall enter the descriptions and the valuations of the parcels on the roll, and shall compute the amount due thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1293.)
-------------------------------------------

2825.

If the assessor has set forth the value of personal property, or leasehold improvements, or possessory interests opposite his determination of the value of the parcel, the amount due on the parcel is the sum of the following:

(a) That amount computed by multiplying the assessed value of the parcel by the applicable tax rate for the current year.

(b) That amount set forth in the certification of the taxing agency or revenue district as being the portion of the lien which is to continue to be levied or placed on the parcel.

(c) Delinquent penalties in an amount which bears the same proportion to the delinquent penalties in the whole assessment as the amount of taxes and liens on the parcel bears to the total amount of taxes and liens levied against the whole assessment.

(d) Costs computed in the same manner provided for the computation of delinquent penalties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1293.)
-------------------------------------------

2826.

If the assessor has not set forth the value of personal property, or leasehold improvements, or possessory interests opposite his determination of the value of the parcel, the amount due on the parcel is the sum of the following:

(a) The amount computed by multiplying the assessed value of the parcel by the applicable tax rate for the current year.

(b) That amount of the tax on personal property, or leasehold improvements, or possessory interests computed by multiplying the assessed value by the applicable tax rate for the current year, which bears the same proportion as the value of the parcel bears to the value of the whole assessment excepting the value of such personal property, leasehold improvements, or possessory interests.

(c) The amount set forth in the certification of the taxing agency or revenue district as being the portion of the lien which is to continue to be levied or placed on the parcel.

(d) Delinquent penalties in an amount which bears the same proportion to the delinquent penalties in the whole assessment as the amount which is the sum of the amounts determined in (a) and in (b) and in (c) above bears to the total amount of taxes and liens levied against the whole assessment.

(e) Costs computed in the same manner as provided for the computation of delinquent penalties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1293.)
-------------------------------------------

2827.

The amount due on the remaining parcel shall be the difference between the amount due on the whole assessment and the amount due on the parcel separately assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1293.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.3. Collection of Taxes [2851. - 2862.]

2851.

It is hereby declared to be the purpose of this chapter to provide an alternative procedure for the collection of property taxes on the secured roll after the second installment of such taxes is delinquent. It is further declared to be the object of this alternative procedure to eliminate the preparation of a delinquent roll by the county tax collector in those counties in which the tax collector has prepared an abstract list of the unpaid items from all delinquent rolls of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 142.)
-------------------------------------------

2852.

The procedure authorized by this chapter may be placed in effect in any county by resolution of the board of supervisors adopted on or before August 1st preceding the lien date of the taxes to which the provisions of this chapter are to apply or, at any time, by resolution of the board of supervisors, specifying the effective date, adopted pursuant to the request of the county assessor, county auditor, and county tax collector; provided, that prior to the adoption of such resolution an abstract list of all unpaid items on the delinquent rolls has been prepared and certified by the county auditor, is in use and will continue to be used by the tax collector.

After adoption of the procedure authorized by this chapter, the tax collector must insert in the abstract list or prepare an abstract list of unpaid items from the secured roll each year in the manner provided in Chapter 4, Part 7, Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 142.)
-------------------------------------------

2853.

When this alternative method of collection of taxes on the secured roll is adopted all entries formerly required by law to be made on the delinquent roll shall thereafter be made on the secured roll except that after the date of the declaration of default for delinquent taxes the entries shall be made on the abstract list.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

2855.

Annually, on or before June 1st, the auditor shall

(a) Compute and enter the delinquent penalties and costs on the secured roll. 

(b) Charge the tax collector with the penalties and costs.

(c) Deliver the secured roll duly certified to the tax collector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 142.)
-------------------------------------------

2856.

Annually, on or before August 10th, the tax collector shall make a collections report on the secured roll and, if one is prepared, the delinquent roll, and make it or them available to the auditor for purposes of audit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 142.)
-------------------------------------------

2857.

The auditor shall then administer an oath to the tax collector, to be written and subscribed on the secured roll, that all property on the secured roll on which taxes have been paid has been credited with the payment on the secured roll.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 239.)
-------------------------------------------

2858.

The auditor shall foot the amount unpaid on the secured roll, credit the tax collector with the amount, and have a final settlement with him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 239.)
-------------------------------------------

2859.

If the roll is transferred from one collector to another, the auditor shall credit the one and charge the other with the amount outstanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 239.)
-------------------------------------------

2860.

If the tax collector refuses or neglects for five days to make payments or settlements as required in this division, he is liable for the full amount of taxes charged against him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 239.)
-------------------------------------------

2861.

The district attorney shall bring suit against the tax collector and his sureties for this amount. The controller or the board of supervisors may require the district attorney to bring this suit if he neglects his duty. After the suit is commenced, no credit shall be made to the tax collector for taxes outstanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 239.)
-------------------------------------------

2862.

The roll, showing unpaid taxes against any property, is prima facie evidence of the assessment, the property assessed, the delinquency, the amount of taxes due and unpaid, and that there has been compliance with all forms of law relating to assessment and levy of the taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 239.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Collection on the Unsecured Roll [2901. - 2963.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [2901. - 2928.1.]

2901.

Taxes on unsecured property are due on the lien date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

2902.

The assessment of unsecured property shall be deemed complete for the purpose of enforcing the collection thereof when the assessor has made a record in writing of the assessment in such form as the board may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

2903.

The tax collector shall collect taxes on unsecured property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 166.)
-------------------------------------------

2905.

In collecting taxes on unsecured property the tax rate to be used is the rate for property of the same kind on the secured roll last fixed before the lien date for the taxes to be collected. In the event that the assessment ratio is changed, the tax rate for unsecured property shall reflect the difference in ratios and shall be based on the assessment ratio for the current year. In collecting taxes on unsecured property that escaped taxation in any prior year or years the rate to be used shall be the rate to which the property would have been subject if it appeared upon the roll in the year when it should have been lawfully assessed. In the event the assessment ratio is changed, the assessed value utilized in determining the amount of the escape assessment shall be that which would have been employed in the year when it should have been lawfully assessed. The taxes on unsecured property shall be computed in dollars and cents, rejecting the fractions of a cent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------

2909.1.

To enable the tax collector to collect taxes on unsecured property on or after the due date, the assessor shall deliver to the tax collector, as soon as practicable after that date, a record in writing of the assessment of the unsecured property in such form as the board may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 166.)
-------------------------------------------

2910.1.

(a) The tax collector may, no later than 30 days prior to the date on which taxes are delinquent and as soon as reasonably possible after receipt of the extended assessment roll, mail or electronically transmit a tax bill for every assessment on the unsecured roll on which taxes are due, unless the total tax bill amount due is too small to justify the cost of collection.

(b) Failure to receive a tax bill shall not relieve the lien of taxes, nor shall it prevent the imposition of penalties imposed by this code. However, the penalty imposed for delinquent taxes as provided by any section in this code shall be canceled if the assessee does either of the following:

(1) Convinces the tax collector that the assessee did not receive the tax bill mailed to the address provided on the tax roll or electronic address provided and authorized by the taxpayer to the tax collector.

(2) Demonstrates to the tax collector that the delinquency is due to the tax collector’s failure to mail or electronically transmit the tax bill to the address provided on the tax roll or electronic address provided and authorized by the taxpayer to the tax collector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 433, Sec. 7.   (SB 825)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2910.5.

When taxes on unsecured property are paid in cash or whenever a receipt is requested at the time of payment by the person paying the tax, the tax collector shall give a receipt to the person making payment, specifying:

(a) The name of the assessee.

(b) The amount of the assessment.

(c) The amount of tax paid.

(d) The beginning and ending of the fiscal year for which the tax is paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1224, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

2910.7.

Any person who receives a tax bill respecting property which has been assessed to another and who has power, pursuant to written or oral authorization, to pay the taxes on behalf of another shall after the taxes have been paid in full and within 30 days of the receipt of the written request of the assessee, either deposit the orginal or a copy of the bill in the United States mail in an envelope addressed to the last known address of the assessee as shown on the bill, postage being prepaid, or deliver it otherwise to the assessee within said 30 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1457.)
-------------------------------------------

2913.

The tax collector shall record a payment of taxes on the unsecured roll by either of the following methods:

(a) By marking the fact and date of payment on the unsecured roll opposite the tax to which the payment relates.

(b) By recording the fact and date of payment on a machine prepared list or in the form of an electronic data processing record.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1187, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2921.5.

Taxes, penalties, and costs on unsecured property, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 134, shall be transferred from the “secured roll” to the “unsecured roll” of the corresponding year by the county auditor on order of the board of supervisors with the written consent of the county legal advisor pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 5081) of Chapter 4 of Part 9 at the same time the taxes are canceled on the property, and shall be collected in the same manner as other delinquent taxes on the “unsecured roll.” Amounts transferred pursuant to this section continue to be subject to delinquent penalties until the amounts are paid and are collectible from either the person from whom the property was acquired or the public entity that acquired the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 276.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2922.

(a) Taxes on the unsecured roll as of July 31, if unpaid, are delinquent at 5 p.m., or the close of business, whichever is later, on August 31 and thereafter subject to a delinquent penalty of 10 percent. 

(b) Taxes added to the unsecured roll after July 31, if unpaid are delinquent and subject to a penalty of 10 percent at 5 p.m., or the close of business, whichever is later, on the last day of the month succeeding the month of enrollment. 

(c) Taxes transferred to the unsecured roll pursuant to any provision of law and already subject to penalties also transferred, shall be subject only to the additional penalties and costs prescribed in subdivisions (d) and (e), which shall attach beginning July 1 and on the first day of each month thereafter. 
